Utah statutes.
26-21-13.6.   Rural hospital -- Optional service designation.

(1)  The Legislature finds that:

(a)  the rural citizens of this state need access to hospitals and primary care clinics;

(b)  financial stability of remote-rural hospitals and their integration into remote-rural delivery networks is critical to ensure the continued viability of remote-rural health care; and

(c)  administrative simplicity is essential for providing large benefits to small-scale remote-rural providers who have limited time and resources.

(2)  After July 1, 1995, the department may grant variances to remote-rural acute care hospitals for specific services currently required for licensure under general hospital standards established by department rule.

(3)  For purposes of this section, "remote-rural hospitals" are hospitals that are in a county with less than 20 people per square mile.

